Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.257

Temporary support, restraining, and protective orders—Effect—Support debts to state.

(1) In a proceeding under this chapter either party may file a motion for temporary support of children entitled to support. The motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and the amount requested.

(2) In a proceeding under this chapter either party may file a motion for a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, providing relief proper in the circumstances, and restraining or enjoining another party from:

(a) Molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party or of any child;

(b) Entering the family home or the home of the other party upon a showing of the necessity therefor;

(c) Knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified location; and

(d) Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3) Either party may request a domestic violence protection order or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW on a temporary basis by filing an appropriate separate civil cause of action. The petitioner shall inform the court of the existence of the action under this title. The court shall set all future protection hearings on the guardianship calendar to be heard concurrent with the action under this title and the clerk shall relate the cases in the case management system. The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW 7.105.310 except relief pertaining to residential provisions for the children which provisions shall be provided for under this chapter. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.

(4) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800, and shall order the respondent to surrender, and prohibit the respondent from possessing, all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license as required in RCW 9.41.800. Such orders may only be made in the civil protection case related to the action under this title.

(5) The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to the other party only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until the time for responding has elapsed.

(6) The court may issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction and an order for temporary support in such amounts and on such terms as are just and proper in the circumstances.

(7) A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary injunction:

(a) Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

(b) May be revoked or modified;

(c) Terminates when the final order is entered or when the motion is dismissed;

(d) May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an existing order.

(8) A support debt owed to the state for public assistance expenditures which has been charged against a party pursuant to RCW 74.20A.040 and/or 74.20A.055 shall not be merged in, or otherwise extinguished by, the final decree or order, unless the office of support enforcement has been given notice of the final proceeding and an opportunity to present its claim for the support debt to the court and has failed to file an affidavit as provided in this subsection. Notice of the proceeding shall be served upon the office of support enforcement personally, or by certified mail, and shall be given no fewer than thirty days prior to the date of the final proceeding. An original copy of the notice shall be filed with the court either before service or within a reasonable time thereafter. The office of support enforcement may present its claim, and thereby preserve the support debt, by filing an affidavit setting forth the amount of the debt with the court, and by mailing a copy of the affidavit to the parties or their attorney prior to the date of the final proceeding.

[ 2021 c 215 s 125; 2020 c 312 s 112.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.